Hawaii statutes.
§704-411 Legal effect of acquittal on the
ground of physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding
responsibility; commitment; conditional release; discharge; procedure for
separate post-acquittal hearing. (1) When a
defendant is acquitted on the ground of physical or mental disease, disorder,
or defect excluding responsibility, the court, on the basis of the report made
pursuant to section 704‑404, if uncontested, or the medical or
psychological evidence given at the trial or at a separate hearing, shall order
that:

(a) The defendant shall be committed to the custody
of the director of health to be placed in an appropriate institution for
custody, care, and treatment if the court finds that the defendant:

(i) Is affected by a physical or mental
disease, disorder, or defect;

(ii) Presents a risk of danger to self or
others; and

(iii) Is not a proper subject for conditional
release;

provided
that the director of health shall place defendants charged with misdemeanors or
felonies not involving violence or attempted violence in the least restrictive
environment appropriate in light of the defendant's treatment needs and the
need to prevent harm to the person confined and others. The county police
departments shall provide to the director of health and the defendant copies of
all police reports from cases filed against the defendant that have been
adjudicated by the acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, a finding
of guilt, acquittal, acquittal pursuant to section 704‑400, or by the
entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere made pursuant to chapter 853;
provided that the disclosure to the director of health and the defendant does
not frustrate a legitimate function of the county police departments; provided
further that expunged records, records of or pertaining to any adjudication or
disposition rendered in the case of a juvenile, or records containing data from
the United States National Crime Information Center shall not be provided. The
county police departments shall segregate or sanitize from the police reports
information that would result in the likelihood or actual identification of
individuals who furnished information in connection with the investigation or
who were of investigatory interest. Records shall not be re-disclosed except
to the extent permitted by law;

(b) The defendant shall be granted conditional
release with conditions as the court deems necessary if the court finds that
the defendant is affected by physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect
and that the defendant presents a danger to self or others, but that the
defendant can be controlled adequately and given proper care, supervision, and
treatment if the defendant is released on condition; or

(c) The defendant shall be discharged if the court finds
that the defendant is no longer affected by physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect or, if so affected, that the defendant no longer presents a
danger to self or others and is not in need of care, supervision, or treatment.

(2) The court, upon its own motion or on the
motion of the prosecuting attorney or the defendant, shall order a separate
post-acquittal hearing for the purpose of taking evidence on the issue of
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect and the risk of danger that the
defendant presents to self or others.

(3) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2018. For subsection effective July 1, 2018, see below.] When ordering a
hearing pursuant to subsection (2):

(a) In nonfelony cases, the court shall appoint a
qualified examiner to examine and report upon the physical and mental condition
of the defendant. The court may appoint either a psychiatrist or a licensed
psychologist. The examiner may be designated by the director of health from
within the department of health. The examiner shall be appointed from a list
of certified examiners as determined by the department of health. The court,
in appropriate circumstances, may appoint an additional examiner or examiners;
and

(b) In felony cases, the court shall appoint three
qualified examiners to examine and report upon the physical and mental
condition of the defendant. In each case, the court shall appoint at least one
psychiatrist and at least one licensed psychologist. The third member may be a
psychiatrist, a licensed psychologist, or a qualified physician. One of the
three shall be a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the
director of health. The three examiners shall be appointed from a list of
certified examiners as determined by the department of health.

To facilitate the examination and the proceedings
thereon, the court may cause the defendant, if not then confined, to be
committed to a hospital or other suitable facility for the purpose of
examination for a period not exceeding thirty days or a longer period as the
court determines to be necessary for the purpose upon written findings for good
cause shown. The court may direct that qualified physicians or psychologists
retained by the defendant be permitted to witness the examination. The examination
and report and the compensation of persons making or assisting in the
examination shall be in accordance with section 704-404(3), (5)(a) and (b),
(7), (8), (9), (10), and (11). As used in this section, the term
"licensed psychologist" includes psychologists exempted from
licensure by section 465‑3(a)(3) and "qualified physician"
means a physician qualified by the court for the specific evaluation ordered.

(3) [Subsection effective July 1, 2018.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2018, see above.] When ordering a
hearing pursuant to subsection (2):

(a) In nonfelony cases, the court shall appoint a
qualified examiner to examine and report upon the physical and mental condition
of the defendant. The court may appoint either a psychiatrist or a licensed
psychologist. The examiner may be designated by the director of health from
within the department of health. The examiner shall be appointed from a list
of certified examiners as determined by the department of health. The court,
in appropriate circumstances, may appoint an additional examiner or examiners;
and

(b) In felony cases, the court shall appoint three
qualified examiners to examine and report upon the physical and mental
condition of the defendant. In each case, the court shall appoint at least one
psychiatrist and at least one licensed psychologist. The third member may be a
psychiatrist, a licensed psychologist, or a qualified physician. One of the
three shall be a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist designated by the director
of health from within the department of health. The three examiners shall be
appointed from a list of certified examiners as determined by the department of
health.

To facilitate the examination and the proceedings
thereon, the court may cause the defendant, if not then confined, to be
committed to a hospital or other suitable facility for the purpose of
examination for a period not exceeding thirty days or a longer period as the
court determines to be necessary for the purpose upon written findings for good
cause shown. The court may direct that qualified physicians or psychologists
retained by the defendant be permitted to witness the examination. The
examination and report and the compensation of persons making or assisting in
the examination shall be in accordance with section 704-404(3), (5)(a) and (b),
(7), (8), (9), (10), and (11). As used in this section, the term
"licensed psychologist" includes psychologists exempted from
licensure by section 465‑3(a)(3) and "qualified physician"
means a physician qualified by the court for the specific evaluation ordered.

(4) Whether the court's order under subsection
(1) is made on the basis of the medical or psychological evidence given at the
trial, or on the basis of the report made pursuant to section 704-404, or the
medical or psychological evidence given at a separate hearing, the burden shall
be upon the State to prove, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
defendant is affected by a physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect and
may not safely be discharged and that the defendant should be either committed
or conditionally released as provided in subsection (1).

(5) In any proceeding governed by this
section, the defendant's fitness shall not be an issue. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1;
am L 1974, c 54, §2; am L 1979, c 3, §2; am L 1983, c 281, §1; am L 1986, c
314, §8; am L 1987, c 145, §2; am L 1988, c 305, §7; am L 1992, c 88, §2; gen
ch 1992; am L 1997, c 306, §3; am L 2006, c 230, §10; am L 2008, c 99, §3 and c
100, §3; am L 2009, c 127, §2; am L 2011, c 99, §2; am L 2016, c 198, §5 and c
231, §§8, 9]

COMMENTARY ON §704-411

This section rejects the concept of mandatory commitment
following a qualified acquittal on the basis of a physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect which precluded defendant's responsibility.[1] The Code
instead authorizes a flexible mode of disposition of defendants thus acquitted,
which depends on (1) the restraint necessary to protect other members of
society and the defendant from the consequences of a recurrence of the
prohibited conduct, and (2) the conditions necessary to afford the defendant
proper care and supervision.

The Code recognizes three types of dispositions: commitment,
conditional release, and discharge. The Code utilizes the concept of conditional
release, which is presently recognized in the field of civil commitment, but
leaves the ultimate determination of the conditions of release with the court,
rather than with the medical authority to whom the defendant is entrusted.

Since the defendant has been detained for a substantial
period of time for purposes of examination prior to the determination of the
defendant's lack of responsibility, the examiners, in an appropriate case, may
be able to indicate, at the trial or at a separate hearing, that commitment is
not called for. In such a case, mandatory commitment followed by an
application for release or discharge would be abusive and wasteful.
Furthermore, a disease, disorder, or defect excluding responsibility which is
influenced by biological or organic factors may be susceptible to adequate
treatment (by means of drugs or otherwise) on an out-patient basis without
danger to other members of society or may be such that repetition of the
prohibited conduct is foreclosed. In such cases commitment should not be made
mandatory.

Proof of penally prohibited conduct at the time of the
alleged offense cannot be used as a justification for automatic commitment
following an acquittal based on lack of responsibility.[2] A determination by
the court will have to be made as to whether the defendant's condition at the
time of disposition requires commitment, conditional release, or discharge.
While proof of the commission of prohibited conduct and an acquittal predicated
on lack of responsibility at the time of the conduct are relevant to and
probative of present dangerousness, they are not substitutes for such a
finding. Although the evidence at trial will be primarily devoted to a
determination of the defendant's physical and mental condition at the time of
the alleged offense, in certain cases the examiners may be able to indicate the
risks which the defendant presents. In some cases a defendant, seeking to
avoid penal liability on the basis of physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect excluding responsibility, may be quite willing to stipulate to the need
for commitment or conditional release following acquittal. In such cases, it
should not be necessary to require that the court hold a separate hearing for
the purpose of determining the defendant's present condition and the risks the
defendant presents.

The Code, therefore, provides in subsection (1) that the
disposition order may be made on the basis of medical evidence given either at
the trial or at a separate hearing. In those instances where the court
believes that the evidence at trial is not sufficiently addressed to the risk
of danger which the defendant presents to allow a determination of that issue,
the court may order a separate hearing. Where either the prosecution or the defense
believes that the evidence at the trial (including stipulations) is not
dispositive of the issue of present danger, each is free to move for a separate
post-acquittal hearing on that issue.

Subsection (3) provides that the procedure to be followed
with respect to a separate post-acquittal hearing shall conform to §704-404 to
the extent applicable.

Subsection (4) provides that the burden of proof with respect
to the issue of present danger is on the government and that proof shall be by
a preponderance of the evidence. This section is consistent with the burden
the government must bear under §704-415 with respect to applications for
discharge, conditional release, or modification of conditions of release.

Previous Hawaii law, which provided "that upon
presentment of due proof that... [the defendant] has regained his sanity at the
time of acquittal, the judge may release such person without... commital [sic],"[3]
fell short of the flexibility and safeguards provided in the Code. By making
dangerousness the relevant criterion, the Code provides for possible commitment
of a dangerous person even though the person's physical or mental condition at
the time of commitment does not preclude penal responsibility. Furthermore,
the Code specifically provides that the court, the prosecution, or the
defendant may move for a separate post-acquittal hearing directed to the
limited issue of present dangerousness. Consistent with the concept of
tailoring the disposition of the irresponsible defendant to the condition of
the defendant and the protection of others, the Code also recognizes
conditional release (in addition to commitment and discharge) and provides for
physical as well as mental conditions which preclude responsibility.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §704-411

Act 54, Session Laws 1974, amended subsection (3) to permit
the use of a certified clinical psychologist as a member of the examination
panel.

Act 3, Session Laws 1979, amended subsection (3) by modifying
the requirements for the composition of examination panels to allow the courts
greater flexibility in appointing mental health professionals.

Act 281, Session Laws 1983, amended subsection (1)(a) so that
defendants charged with nonviolent crimes who are acquitted pursuant to chapter
704, may be placed in the least restrictive environment which takes into
account the defendant's treatment needs and the need to prevent harm to the
defendant and others. Also, subsections (1) and (2) were amended to delete a
person's "danger to property" as a criteria justifying commitment,
based on Suzuki v. Yuen, 617 F.2d 173 (9th Cir. 1980), in which the court found
that criteria unconstitutionally broad. House Conference Committee Report No.
27.

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, amended "certified clinical
psychologists" to "licensed psychologists." This change was
made because psychologists are licensed and not certified and the term "clinical"
does not accurately describe psychologists qualified to determine penal
responsibility and fitness to proceed. Act 314 also provided an exception to
the licensure requirement which recognizes that under §465-3(4), psychologists
employed under government certification or civil service rules are exempt from
the licensure requirement. Conference Committee Report No. 51-86.

Act 145, Session Laws 1987, permitted the department of
health to set minimum standards for participation and appointment of a sanity
examiner. The legislature felt this change would allow additional assurances
of higher quality testimony by these examiners. Senate Standing Committee
Report No. 691, House Standing Committee Report No. 1217.

Act 305, Session Laws 1988, included licensed psychologists
among the professionals which may provide offender examination services to the
Hawaii criminal justice system. The legislature stated that the present laws,
which permit only psychiatric evaluation, are inconsistent with the many and
varied uses the court has found for the services of licensed psychologists.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2153.

Act 88, Session Laws 1992, made technical amendments to the
section for purposes of clarity, consistency, and style. Senate Standing
Committee Report No. 2579.

Act 306, Session Laws 1997, amended subsection (3) by, inter
alia, allowing mental health examinations to be conducted by one rather than
three examiners in nonfelony cases; the courts are allowed to appoint either a
psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist as the examiner. In felony cases,
three examiners are required, including at least one psychiatrist and one
psychologist. The Act also limited the time period during which a defendant,
if not then confined, may be committed by the court for examination, to not
more than thirty days unless the court determines it necessary upon written
findings. The amendment streamlines the process for committing and releasing
mentally incompetent defendants. Conference Committee Report No. 64.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended this section to, among
other things, require that in a post-acquittal hearing, a defendant's fitness
shall not be an issue for a defendant who has been acquitted on the grounds of
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect. House Standing Committee
Report No. 665-06.

Act 99, Session Laws 2008, amended subsection (1) by requiring
the county police departments to provide to the director of health and a
defendant who is committed to the custody of the director, copies of certain
police reports regarding that defendant. Act 99 expedited the records
disclosure process for clinical evaluation purposes while protecting a
patient's right of privacy. Conference Committee Report No. 161-08.

Act 100, Session Laws 2008, amended this section by
authorizing the director of health or a committed person to apply to the court
to conduct a hearing to assess any further need for inpatient hospitalization
of a person who is acquitted on the ground of physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect excluding responsibility. Act 100 also required the court
to complete the hearing process and render a decision within sixty days of the
application, provided that for good cause, the court may extend the sixty day
time frame upon the request of the director of health or the committed person.
Conference Committee Report No. 37-08.

Act 127, Session Laws 2009, amended this section by repealing
subsections (5), (6), and (7), which had been interpreted as having established
an additional hearing and application procedure for persons committed to the
Hawaii state hospital due to an acquittal based on the ground of physical or
mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding responsibility. The repeal of
the subsections clarified that §704-412 governs the timing and standards for
conditional release or discharge from the custody of the director of health. Senate
Standing Committee Report No. 533.

Act 99, Session Laws 2011, established a maximum one-year
period of post-acquittal conditional release for persons charged with a petty
misdemeanor, misdemeanor, or violation to promote the efficient use of criminal
justice resources. The legislature found that although persons acquitted of
criminal charges by reason of physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect
may be released to the community on a post-acquittal conditional release after
a court determines that the persons can be adequately controlled and given
proper care, supervision, and treatment, there are many instances where people
remain on conditional release far longer than the maximum penalty allowed for
the offense charged. According to the department of health, ninety per cent of
persons on conditional release in Hawaii for a misdemeanor or petty misdemeanor
are kept on conditional release longer than they would have spent on maximum
jail time or on probation for the same offense, sometimes up to twenty times
longer. This increases the burden on staff and financial resources at district
courts, probation offices, mental health centers, and hospitals. By
establishing a specific time limit on the conditional release of persons
charged with lesser offenses, Act 99 increases the availability of resources
for more serious offenders. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 1170.

Act 198, Session Laws 2016, amended this section by making
conforming amendments. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 2261. Act 198
also amended this section by adding the definition of "qualified
physician."

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended subsections (1) and (3)
to implement recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened
pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Law Journals and Reviews

Unfair Punishment of the Mentally Disabled? The
Constitutionality of Treating Extremely Dangerous and Mentally Ill Insanity
Acquittees in Prison Facilities. 23 UH L. Rev. 623 (2001).

Risky Business: Assessing Dangerousness in Hawai‘i. 24 UH
L. Rev. 63 (2001).

Case Notes

Prosecutor's comment that defendant, whose defense was
insanity, would "walk the streets" if acquitted was improper. 58 H.
623, 574 P.2d 895 (1978).

Liability for subsequent harm done by criminal defendant
placed on conditional release. 61 H. 253, 602 P.2d 532 (1979).

The difference in the burden of proof required for commitment
under this section and under §334-60(b)(4)(I) does not render this section
violative of due process or equal protection. 63 H. 186, 623 P.2d 881 (1981).

Where defendant failed to follow the procedural mechanisms
set forth in this section by failing to request a post-acquittal hearing to
address the issue of dangerousness in a proceeding separate from the trial
proceedings, supreme court lacked appellate jurisdiction to review trial
court's decision. 102 H. 130, 73 P.3d 668 (2003).

__________

§704-411 Commentary:

1. M.P.C. §4.08.

2. Bolton v. Harris, 395 F.2d 642 (1968).

3. H.R.S. §711-93.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next